test/src/morphology/N-suqg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - suʼg: # Noun 74 'eng /est sugulane/fin' - full paradigm
     suʼg+N+Sg+Nom: suʼg
     suʼg+N+Sg+Gen: suʼg
     suʼg+N+Sg+Par: suʼggõ
     suʼg+N+Sg+Dat: suʼggõn
     suʼg+N+Sg+Ins: suʼgkõks
     suʼg+N+Sg+Ill: suʼggõ
     suʼg+N+Sg+Ela: suʼgstõ
     suʼg+N+Pl+Nom: sugūd
     suʼg+N+Pl+Gen: sugūd
     suʼg+N+Pl+Par: sugīdi
     suʼg+N+Pl+Dat: sugūdõn
     suʼg+N+Pl+Ins: sugūdõks
     suʼg+N+Pl+Ill: suʼgži
     suʼg+N+Pl+Ela: suʼgšti
